North Carolina statutes. Chapter 120C. Lobbying.
Article 5. Liaison Personnel.

§ 120C-500.
Liaison personnel.

All agencies and constitutional officers of the State, including all boards, departments, divisions, constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina, community colleges, and other units of government in the executive branch shall designate liaison personnel to lobby for legislative action. This subsection shall not apply to units of local government, or a State agency or board with no staff.

No State agency or constitutional officer of the State may contract with individuals who are not employed by the State to lobby legislators and legislative employees. This subsection shall not apply to counsel employed by any agency, board, department, or division authorized to employ counsel under

G.S. 147-17

.

No more than two individuals may be designated as liaison personnel for each agency and constitutional officers of the State, including all boards, departments, divisions, constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina, community colleges, and other units of government in the executive branch.

The Chief Justice of the Supreme Court shall designate at least one, but no more than four, liaison personnel to lobby for legislative action for all offices, conferences, commissions, and other agencies established under Chapter 7A of the General Statutes. This subsection shall not apply to any office created under Article 60 of Chapter 7A of the General Statutes, so long as that office complies with subsection (a) of this section.

Notwithstanding subsection (c) of this section, the Secretary of Public Safety shall designate at least one, but no more than five, liaison personnel to lobby for legislative action for all offices, commissions, and agencies within the Department of Public Safety, as established by Article 13 of Chapter 143B.

History.

1933, c. 11, s. 7; 1975, c. 820, s. 1; 1977, c. 697; 1991, c. 740, s. 1.1; 1993, c. 553, s. 3; 2001-424, s. 6.10(a); 2005-456, s. 1; 2006-201, s. 18; 2007-347, s. 6(a); 2008-213, ss. 30-32; 2012-83, s. 6; 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 120C-501.
Applicability of Chapter on liaison personnel.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, this Chapter shall not apply to liaison personnel.

G.S. 120C-200

shall apply to liaison personnel. No registration fee shall be required for registration under this subsection.

Liaison personal designated under this Article shall file reports under

G.S. 120C-402

.

G.S. 120C-303

shall apply to liaison personnel with respect to legislators and legislative employees.

The Board of Governors of the University of North Carolina and its constituent institutions, or the liaison personnel designated by that board or the constituent institutions, shall not give, for lobbying, athletic tickets to any designated individual, except for those who are described in G.S. 138A-3(70)j. or those who are students and receive tickets on the same basis as other students.

History.

2001-424, s. 6.10(a); 2005-456, s. 1; 2006-201, s. 18; 2008-213, s. 33; 2010-169, s. 17(l); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§ 120C-502.
Local government liaison equivalents.

An individual who is an employee of a governmental unit whose principal duties, in practice or as set forth in that individual’s job description, include lobbying for legislative action shall register under

G.S. 120C-200

.

G.S. 120C-501

shall apply to an individual required to register under subsection (a) of this section.

For purposes of publication of the registry under

G.S. 120C-220

, the Secretary of State shall treat individuals registered under this section as liaison personnel.

History.

2010-169, s. 5(a); 2017-6, s. 3; 2018-146, s. 3.1(a), (b).

§§ 120C-503 through 120C-599.

Reserved for future codification purposes.